Florida, session 2026, SB650.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âChapter 205, Florida Statutes, consisting of ss. 22 205.013, 205.022, 205.023, 205.0315, 205.032, 205.033, 205.042, 23 205.043, 205.044, 205.045, 205.053, 205.0532, 205.0535, 24 205.0536, 205.0537, 205.054, 205.055, 205.063, 205.064, 205.065, 25 205.066, 205.067, 205.162, 205.191, 205.192, 205.193, 205.194, 26 205.196, 205.1965, 205.1967, 205.1969, 205.1971, 205.1973, and 27 205.1975, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 28 Section 2.âSection 218.15, Florida Statutes, is created to 29 read: 30 218.15âCounty business tax measured by gross receipts may 31 continue.âNotwithstanding the repeal of former chapter 205, by 32 this act, a county that imposes a business tax on merchants 33 which is measured by gross receipts from the sale of merchandise 34 or services, or both, may continue to impose such tax and may, 35 by ordinance, revise the definition of the term âmerchant.â 36 However, the county may not revise the rate of the tax measured 37 by gross sales. 38 Section 3.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 39 replace the phrase âthis actâ wherever it occurs in s. 218.15, 40 Florida Statutes, with the assigned chapter number of this act. 41 Section 4.âSubsection (2), paragraph (b) of subsection (3), 42 and paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 125.01047, 43 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 44 125.01047âRules and ordinances relating to towing 45 services.â 46 (2)âThe prohibition set forth in subsection (1) does not 47 affect a countyâs authority to: 48 (a)âLevy a reasonable business tax under s. 205.0315, s. 49 205.033, or s. 205.0535. 50 (b)âimpose and collect a reasonable administrative fee or 51 charge on the registered owner or other legally authorized 52 person in control of a vehicle or vessel, not to exceed 25 53 percent of the maximum towing rate, to cover the cost of 54 enforcement, including parking enforcement, by the county when 55 the vehicle or vessel is towed from public property. An 56 authorized wrecker operator or towing business may impose and 57 collect the administrative fee or charge on behalf of the county 58 and shall remit such fee or charge to the county only after it 59 is collected. 60 (3) 61 (b)âA charter county may impose and collect an 62 administrative fee or charge as provided in subsection (2) 63 paragraph (2)(b) but may not impose such fee or charge on a 64 towing business or an authorized wrecker operator. If the 65 charter county imposes such administrative fee or charge, the 66 charter county may authorize a towing business or authorized 67 wrecker operator to impose and collect such fee or charge on 68 behalf of the county, and the towing business or authorized 69 wrecker operator shall remit such fee or charge to the charter 70 county only after it is collected. 71 (4) 72 (b)âA charter county may impose and collect an 73 administrative fee or charge as provided in subsection (2) 74 paragraph (2)(b); however, it may not impose that fee or charge 75 upon a towing business or an authorized wrecker operator. If 76 such charter county imposes such administrative fee or charge, 77 such fee or charge must be imposed on the registered owner or 78 other legally authorized person in control of a vehicle or 79 vessel. The fee or charge may not exceed 25 percent of the 80 maximum towing rate to cover the cost of enforcement, including 81 parking enforcement, by the charter county when the vehicle or 82 vessel is towed from public property. The charter county may 83 authorize an authorized wrecker operator or towing business to 84 impose and collect the administrative fee or charge on behalf of 85 the charter county, and the authorized wrecker operator or 86 towing business shall remit such fee or charge to the charter 87 county only after it is collected. 88 Section 5.âSubsection (2) of section 166.04465, Florida 89 Statutes, is amended to read: 90 166.04465âRules and ordinances relating to towing 91 services.â 92 (2)âThe prohibition set forth in subsection (1) does not 93 affect a municipalityâs authority to: 94 (a)âLevy a reasonable business tax under s. 205.0315, s. 95 205.043, or s. 205.0535. 96 (b)âimpose and collect a reasonable administrative fee or 97 charge on the registered owner or other legally authorized 98 person in control of a vehicle or vessel, not to exceed 25 99 percent of the maximum towing rate, to cover the cost of 100 enforcement, including parking enforcement, by the municipality 101 when the vehicle or vessel is towed from public property. An 102 authorized wrecker operator or towing business may impose and 103 collect the administrative fee or charge on behalf of the 104 municipality and shall remit such fee or charge to the 105 municipality only after it is collected. 106 Section 6.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 107 202.24, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 108 202.24âLimitations on local taxes and fees imposed on 109 dealers of communications services.â 110 (2) 111 (c)âThis subsection does not apply to: 112 1.âLocal communications services taxes levied under this 113 chapter. 114 2.âAd valorem taxes levied pursuant to chapter 200. 115 3.âBusiness taxes levied under chapter 205. 116 3.4.ââ911â service charges levied under chapter 365. 117 4.5.âAmounts charged for the rental or other use of 118 property owned by a public body which is not in the public 119 rights-of-way to a dealer of communications services for any 120 purpose, including, but not limited to, the placement or 121 attachment of equipment used in the provision of communications 122 services. 123 5.6.âPermit fees of general applicability which are not 124 related to placing or maintaining facilities in or on public 125 roads or rights-of-way. 126 6.7.âPermit fees related to placing or maintaining 127 facilities in or on public roads or rights-of-way pursuant to s. 128 337.401. 129 7.8.âAny in-kind requirements, institutional networks, or 130 contributions for, or in support of, the use or construction of 131 public, educational, or governmental access facilities allowed 132 under federal law and imposed on providers of video service 133 pursuant to any existing ordinance or an existing franchise 134 agreement granted by each municipality or county, under which 135 ordinance or franchise agreement service is provided before July 136 1, 2007, or as permitted under chapter 610. This subparagraph 137 does not prohibit providers of video service from recovering the 138 expenses as allowed under federal law. 139 8.9.âSpecial assessments and impact fees. 140 9.10.âPole attachment fees that are charged by a local 141 government for attachments to utility poles owned by the local 142 government. 143 10.11.âUtility service fees or other similar user fees for 144 utility services. 145 11.12.âAny other generally applicable tax, fee, charge, or 146 imposition authorized by general law on July 1, 2000, which is 147 not specifically prohibited by this subsection or included as a 148 replaced revenue source in s. 202.20. 149 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 150 213.0535, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 151 213.0535âRegistration Information Sharing and Exchange 152 Program.â 153 (4)âThere are two levels of participation: 154 (a)âEach unit of state or local government responsible for 155 administering one or more of the provisions specified in 156 subparagraphs 1.-7. 1.-8. is a level-one participant. Level-one 157 participants shall exchange, monthly or quarterly, as determined 158 jointly by each participant and the department, the data 159 enumerated in subsection (2) for each new registrant, new filer, 160 or initial reporter, permittee, or licensee, with respect to the 161 following taxes, licenses, or permits: 162 1.âThe sales and use tax imposed under chapter 212. 163 2.âThe tourist development tax imposed under s. 125.0104. 164 3.âThe tourist impact tax imposed under s. 125.0108. 165 4.âLocal business taxes imposed under chapter 205. 166 4.5.âConvention development taxes imposed under s. 167 212.0305. 168 5.6.âPublic lodging and food service establishment licenses 169 issued pursuant to chapter 509. 170 6.7.âBeverage law licenses issued pursuant to chapter 561. 171 7.8.âA municipal resort tax as authorized under chapter 67 172 930, Laws of Florida. 173 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 174 213.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 175 213.055âDeclared emergency; waiver or suspension of 176 specified revenue laws and other requirements.â 177 (3) 178 (b)1.âNotwithstanding any other law, an out-of-state 179 business that is conducting operations within this state during 180 a disaster-response period solely for purposes of performing 181 emergency-related work or pursuant to a mutual aid agreement is 182 not considered to have established a level of presence that 183 would require that business to register, file, and remit state 184 or local taxes or fees or require that business to be subject to 185 any registration, licensing, or filing requirements in this 186 state. For purposes of any state or local tax on or measured, in 187 whole or in part, by net or gross income or receipts, the 188 activity of the out-of-state business conducted in this state 189 during the disaster-response period must be disregarded with 190 respect to any filing requirements for such tax, including the 191 filing required for a consolidated group of which the out-of- 192 state business may be a part. This includes the following: 193 a.âReemployment assistance taxes. 194 b.âState or local professional or occupational licensing 195 requirements or related fees. 196 c.âLocal business taxes. 197 c.d.âTaxes on the operation of commercial motor vehicles. 198 d.e.âCorporate income tax. 199 e.f.âTangible personal property tax and use tax on 200 equipment that is brought into the state by the out-of-state 201 business, used by the out-of-state business only to perform 202 emergency-related work during the disaster-response period, and 203 removed from the state by the out-of-state business after the 204 disaster-response period. 205 2.âNotwithstanding any other law, an out-of-state employee 206 whose only employment in this state is for the performance of 207 emergency-related work or pursuant to a mutual aid agreement 208 during a disaster-response period is not required to comply with 209 state or local occupational licensing requirements or related 210 fees. 211 Section 9.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 212 213.756, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 213 213.756âFunds collected are state tax funds.â 214 (2) 215 (b)âThis subsection applies to those taxes enumerated in s. 216 72.011, excluding chapter 202 and that portion of chapter 203 217 collected thereunder, and also applies to taxes imposed under 218 chapter 205. 219 Section 10.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 220 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 221 330.41âUnmanned Aircraft Systems Act.â 222 (3)âREGULATION.â 223 (c)âExcept as otherwise expressly provided, a political 224 subdivision may not withhold issuance of a business tax receipt, 225 development permit, or other use approval to a drone delivery 226 service or enact or enforce an ordinance or resolution that 227 prohibits a drone delivery serviceâs operation based on the 228 location of its drone port, notwithstanding part II of chapter 229 163 and chapter 205. A political subdivision may enforce minimum 230 setback and landscaping regulations that are generally 231 applicable to permitted uses in the drone port siteâs zoning 232 district. This paragraph may not be construed to authorize a 233 political subdivision to require additional landscaping as a 234 condition of approval of a drone port. 235 Section 11.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) of section 236 337.401, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 237 337.401âUse of right-of-way for utilities subject to 238 regulation; permit; fees.â 239 (3) 240 (f)âExcept as expressly allowed or authorized by general 241 law and except for the rights-of-way permit fees subject to 242 paragraph (c), a municipality or county may not levy on a 243 provider of communications services a tax, fee, or other charge 244 or imposition for operating as a provider of communications 245 services within the jurisdiction of the municipality or county 246 which is in any way related to using its roads or rights-of-way. 247 A municipality or county may not require or solicit in-kind 248 compensation, except as otherwise provided in s. 202.24(2)(c)7. 249 s. 202.24(2)(c)8., provided that the in-kind compensation is not 250 a franchise fee under federal law. Nothing in this paragraph 251 impairs the authority of a municipality or county to request 252 public, educational, or governmental access channels pursuant to 253 s. 610.109. Nothing in this paragraph shall impair any ordinance 254 or agreement in effect on May 22, 1998, or any voluntary 255 agreement entered into subsequent to that date, which provides 256 for or allows in-kind compensation by a telecommunications 257 company. 258 Section 12.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 259 376.84, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 260 376.84âBrownfield redevelopment economic incentives.âIt is 261 the intent of the Legislature that brownfield redevelopment 262 activities be viewed as opportunities to significantly improve 263 the utilization, general condition, and appearance of these 264 sites. Different standards than those in place for new 265 development, as allowed under current state and local laws, 266 should be used to the fullest extent to encourage the 267 redevelopment of a brownfield. State and local governments are 268 encouraged to offer redevelopment incentives for this purpose, 269 as an ongoing public investment in infrastructure and services, 270 to help eliminate the public health and environmental hazards, 271 and to promote the creation of jobs in these areas. Such 272 incentives may include financial, regulatory, and technical 273 assistance to persons and businesses involved in the 274 redevelopment of the brownfield pursuant to this act. 275 (1)âFinancial incentives and local incentives for 276 redevelopment may include, but not be limited to: 277 (d)âWaiver, reduction, or limitation by line of business 278 with respect to business taxes pursuant to chapter 205. 279 Section 13.âSubsection (4) of section 379.3761, Florida 280 Statutes, is amended to read: 281 379.3761âExhibition or sale of wildlife; fees; 282 classifications.â 283 (4)âThe provisions of this section relative to licensing 284 for exhibition do not apply to any municipal, county, state, or 285 other publicly owned wildlife exhibit or any traveling zoo, 286 circus, or exhibit licensed under chapter 205. 287 Section 14.âSubsection (5) of section 482.071, Florida 288 Statutes, is amended to read: 289 482.071âLicenses.â 290 (5)âA license under this section is a prerequisite for the 291 issuance of a local occupational license to engage in pest 292 control, as provided in s. 205.1967. 293 Section 15.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 294 482.242, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 295 482.242âPreemption.â 296 (1)âThis chapter is intended as comprehensive and exclusive 297 regulation of pest control in this state. The provisions of this 298 chapter preempt to the state all regulation of the activities 299 and operations of pest control services, including the 300 pesticides used pursuant to labeling and registration approved 301 under part I of chapter 487. No local government or political 302 subdivision of the state may enact or enforce an ordinance that 303 regulates pest control, except that the preemption in this 304 section does not prohibit a local government or political 305 subdivision from enacting an ordinance regarding any of the 306 following: 307 (a)âLocal business taxes adopted pursuant to chapter 205. 308 Section 16.âSubsection (1) of section 489.127, Florida 309 Statutes, is amended to read: 310 489.127âProhibitions; penalties.â 311 (1)âNo person shall: 312 (a)âFalsely hold himself or herself or a business 313 organization out as a licensee, certificateholder, or 314 registrant; 315 (b)âFalsely impersonate a certificateholder or registrant; 316 (c)âPresent as his or her own the certificate or 317 registration of another; 318 (d)âKnowingly give false or forged evidence to the board or 319 a member thereof; 320 (e)âUse or attempt to use a certificate or registration 321 that has been suspended or revoked; 322 (f)âEngage in the business or act in the capacity of a 323 contractor or advertise himself or herself or a business 324 organization as available to engage in the business or act in 325 the capacity of a contractor without being duly registered or 326 certified; 327 (g)âOperate a business organization engaged in contracting 328 after 60 days following the termination of its only qualifying 329 agent without designating another primary qualifying agent, 330 except as provided in ss. 489.119 and 489.1195; 331 (h)âCommence or perform work for which a building permit is 332 required pursuant to part IV of chapter 553 without such 333 building permit being in effect; or 334 (i)âWillfully or deliberately disregard or violate any 335 municipal or county ordinance relating to uncertified or 336 unregistered contractors. 337 338 For purposes of this subsection, a person or business 339 organization operating on an inactive or suspended certificate 340 or registration is not duly certified or registered and is 341 considered unlicensed. A business tax receipt issued under the 342 authority of chapter 205 is not a license for purposes of this 343 part. 344 Section 17.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 345 489.128, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 346 489.128âContracts entered into by unlicensed contractors 347 unenforceable.â 348 (1)âAs a matter of public policy, contracts entered into on 349 or after October 1, 1990, by an unlicensed contractor shall be 350 unenforceable in law or in equity by the unlicensed contractor. 351 (b)âFor purposes of this section, an individual or business 352 organization may not be considered unlicensed for failing to 353 have a business tax receipt issued under the authority of 354 chapter 205. 355 Section 18.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 356 489.131, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 357 489.131âApplicability.â 358 (3)âNothing in this part limits the power of a municipality 359 or county: 360 (c)âTo collect business taxes, subject to s. 205.065, and 361 inspection fees for engaging in contracting or examination fees 362 from persons who are registered with the board pursuant to local 363 examination requirements and issue business tax receipts. 364 However, nothing in this part shall be construed to require 365 general contractors, building contractors, or residential 366 contractors to obtain additional business tax receipts for 367 specialty work when such specialty work is performed by 368 employees of such contractors on projects for which they have 369 substantially full responsibility and such contractors do not 370 hold themselves out to the public as being specialty 371 contractors. 372 Section 19.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 373 489.532, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 374 489.532âContracts entered into by unlicensed contractors 375 unenforceable.â 376 (1)âAs a matter of public policy, contracts entered into on 377 or after October 1, 1990, by an unlicensed contractor shall be 378 unenforceable in law or in equity by the unlicensed contractor. 379 (b)âFor purposes of this section, an individual or business 380 organization shall not be considered unlicensed for failing to 381 have a business tax receipt issued under the authority of 382 chapter 205. 383 Section 20.âSubsection (8) of section 489.537, Florida 384 Statutes, is amended to read: 385 489.537âApplication of this part.â 386 (8)âPersons licensed under this part are subject to ss. 387 205.0535(1) and 205.065, as applicable. 388 Section 21.âSubsection (8) of section 500.12, Florida 389 Statutes, is amended to read: 390 500.12âFood permits; building permits.â 391 (8)âA person who applies for or renews a local business tax 392 certificate to engage in business as a food establishment must 393 exhibit a current food permit or an active letter of exemption 394 from the department before the local business tax certificate 395 may be issued or renewed. 396 Section 22.âSubsection (3) of section 500.511, Florida 397 Statutes, is amended to read: 398 500.511âFees; enforcement; preemption.â 399 (3)âPREEMPTION OF AUTHORITY TO REGULATE.âRegulation of 400 bottled water plants, water vending machines, water vending 401 machine operators, and packaged ice plants is preempted by the 402 state. No county or municipality may adopt or enforce any 403 ordinance that regulates the licensure or operation of bottled 404 water plants, water vending machines, or packaged ice plants, 405 unless it is determined that unique conditions exist within the 406 county which require the county to regulate such entities in 407 order to protect the public health. This subsection does not 408 prohibit a county or municipality from requiring a business tax 409 pursuant to chapter 205. 410 Section 23.âSubsection (7) of section 501.015, Florida 411 Statutes, is amended to read: 412 501.015âHealth studios; registration requirements and 413 fees.âEach health studio shall: 414 (7)âA person applying for or renewing a local business tax 415 receipt to engage in business as a health studio must exhibit an 416 active registration certificate from the Department of 417 Agriculture and Consumer Services before the local business tax 418 receipt may be issued or reissued. 419 Section 24.âSubsection (1) of section 501.016, Florida 420 Statutes, is amended to read: 421 501.016âHealth studios; security requirements.âEach health 422 studio that sells contracts for health studio services shall 423 meet the following requirements: 424 (1)âEach health studio shall maintain for each separate 425 business location a bond issued by a surety company admitted to 426 do business in this state. The principal sum of the bond must be 427 $25,000, and the bond, when required, must be obtained before a 428 business tax receipt may be issued under chapter 205. Upon 429 issuance of a business tax receipt, the licensing authority 430 shall immediately notify the department of such issuance in a 431 manner established by the department by rule. The bond must be 432 in favor of the department for the benefit of a person injured 433 as a result of a violation of ss. 501.012-501.019. Liability for 434 injuries as a result of a violation of ss. 501.012-501.019 may 435 be determined in an administrative proceeding of the department 436 or through a civil action. However, claims against the bond or 437 certificate of deposit may only be paid by order of the 438 department in an administrative proceeding in amounts up to the 439 determined liability for the injuries. The aggregate liability 440 of the surety to all persons for all breaches of the conditions 441 of the bonds provided by this section may not exceed the amount 442 of the bond. The original surety bond required by this section 443 shall be filed with the department on a form adopted by 444 department rule. 445 Section 25.âSubsection (8) of section 501.160, Florida 446 Statutes, is amended to read: 447 501.160âRental or sale of essential commodities during a 448 declared state of emergency; prohibition against unconscionable 449 prices.â 450 (8)âUpon a declaration of a state of emergency by the 451 Governor, in order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of 452 residents, any person who offers goods and services for sale to 453 the public during the duration of the emergency and who does not 454 possess a business tax receipt under s. 205.032 or s. 205.042 455 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 456 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. During a declared 457 emergency, this subsection does not apply to religious, 458 charitable, fraternal, civic, educational, or social 459 organizations. During a declared emergency and when there is an 460 allegation of price gouging against the person, failure to 461 possess a license constitutes reasonable cause to detain the 462 person, provided that the detention shall only be made in a 463 reasonable manner and only for a reasonable period of time 464 sufficient for an inquiry into the circumstances surrounding the 465 failure to possess a license. 466 Section 26.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (1) of 467 section 507.13, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 468 507.13âLocal regulation.â 469 (1)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) paragraphs (b) 470 and (c), this chapter preempts a local ordinance or regulation 471 of a county or municipality which regulates transactions 472 relating to movers of household goods or moving brokers. 473 (c)âThis section does not preempt a local governmentâs 474 authority to levy a local business tax pursuant to chapter 205. 475 Section 27.âParagraph (f) of subsection (3) of section 476 539.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 477 539.001âThe Florida Pawnbroking Act.â 478 (3)âLICENSE REQUIRED.â 479 (f)âAny person applying for or renewing a local 480 occupational license to engage in business as a pawnbroker must 481 exhibit a current license from the agency before the local 482 business tax receipt may be issued or reissued. 483 Section 28.âSubsection (7) of section 559.904, Florida 484 Statutes, is amended to read: 485 559.904âMotor vehicle repair shop registration; 486 application; exemption.â 487 (7)âAny person applying for or renewing a local business 488 tax receipt to engage in business as a motor vehicle repair shop 489 must exhibit an active registration certificate from the 490 department before the local business tax receipt may be issued 491 or renewed. 492 Section 29.âSubsection (4) of section 559.928, Florida 493 Statutes, is amended to read: 494 559.928âRegistration.â 495 (4)âA person applying for or renewing a local business tax 496 receipt to engage in business as a seller of travel must exhibit 497 a current registration certificate from the department before 498 the local business tax receipt may be issued or reissued. 499 Section 30.âSubsection (2) of section 559.9281, Florida 500 Statutes, is amended to read: 501 559.9281âStudent tour operators.â 502 (2)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 503 section, including the establishment of the application 504 procedures and minimum standards for those persons wishing to be 505 approved as student tour operators under this section. At a 506 minimum, a student tour operator must be registered and approved 507 by the department as a seller of travel under s. 559.928, 508 maintain security requirements provided under s. 559.929, and be 509 current on all state and local business taxes. 510 Section 31.âSubsection (6) of section 559.935, Florida 511 Statutes, is amended to read: 512 559.935âExemptions.â 513 (6)âThe department shall request from the Airlines 514 Reporting Corporation any information necessary to implement the 515 provisions of subsection (2). Persons claiming an exemption 516 under subsection (2) or subsection (3) must show a letter of 517 exemption from the department before a local business tax 518 receipt to engage in business as a seller of travel may be 519 issued or reissued. If the department fails to issue a letter of 520 exemption on a timely basis, the seller of travel shall submit 521 to the department, through certified mail, an affidavit 522 containing her or his name and address and an explanation of the 523 exemption sought. Such affidavit may be used in lieu of a letter 524 of exemption for the purpose of obtaining a business tax 525 receipt. In any civil or criminal proceeding, the burden of 526 proving an exemption under this section is on the person 527 claiming such exemption. A letter of exemption issued by the 528 department may not be used in, and has no bearing on, such 529 proceedings. 530 Section 32.âSection 559.939, Florida Statutes, is amended 531 to read: 532 559.939âState preemption.âNo municipality or county or 533 other political subdivision of this state shall have authority 534 to levy or collect any registration fee or tax, as a regulatory 535 measure, or to require the registration or bonding in any manner 536 of any seller of travel who is registered or complies with all 537 applicable provisions of this part, unless that authority is 538 provided for by special or general act of the Legislature. Any 539 ordinance, resolution, or regulation of any municipality or 540 county or other political subdivision of this state which is in 541 conflict with any provision of this part is preempted by this 542 part. The provisions of this section do not apply to any local 543 business tax levied pursuant to chapter 205. 544 Section 33.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 545 559.955, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 546 559.955âHome-based businesses; local government 547 restrictions.â 548 (2)âA home-based business that operates from a residential 549 property as provided in subsection (3): 550 (c)âIs only subject to applicable business taxes under 551 chapter 205 in the county and municipality in which the home 552 based business is located. 553 Section 34.âSection 616.12, Florida Statutes, is amended to 554 read: 555 616.12âLicenses upon certain shows; distribution of fees; 556 exemptions.â 557 (1)âEach person who operates any traveling show, 558 exhibition, amusement enterprise, carnival, vaudeville, exhibit, 559 rodeo, theatrical, game or test of skill, riding device, 560 dramatic repertoire, other show or amusement, or concession, 561 including a concession operating in a tent, enclosure, or other 562 temporary structure, within the grounds of, and in connection 563 with, any annual public fair held by a fair association shall 564 pay the license taxes provided by law. However, if the 565 association satisfies the requirements of this chapter, 566 including securing the required fair permit from the department, 567 the license taxes and local business tax authorized in chapter 568 205 are waived and the department shall issue a tax exemption 569 certificate. The department shall adopt the proper forms and 570 rules to administer this section, including the necessary tax 571 exemption certificate, showing that the fair association has met 572 all requirements and that the traveling show, exhibition, 573 amusement enterprise, carnival, vaudeville, exhibit, rodeo, 574 theatrical, game or test of skill, riding device, dramatic 575 repertoire, other show or amusement, or concession is exempt. 576 (2)âAny fair association securing the required annual fair 577 permit from the department is exempt from local business tax as 578 defined by chapter 205, occupational permit fees, or any 579 occupational taxes assessed by any county, municipality, 580 political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof. 581 Section 35.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.